Hawaii statutes.
[§466D-7] Exemptions. This chapter is
not intended to restrict the practice of other licensed or credentialed
healthcare practitioners practicing within their own recognized scopes of
practice and shall not apply to:

(1) A person working within the scope of practice or
duties of another licensed profession that overlaps with the practice of
respiratory care; provided that the person does not purport to be a respiratory
therapist;

(2) A person working as, or training to become, a
sleep technologist or person who is enrolled in a Commission on Accreditation
of Allied Health Education Programs, Accredited Sleep Technologist Education
Program, or a program approved by the American Association of Sleep
Technologists to become a sleep technologist; provided that, as used in this
paragraph, a "sleep technologist" is defined as a person trained in
sleep technology and relevant aspects of sleep medicine, evaluation, and
follow-up care of patients with sleep disorders;

(3) A person enrolled as a student in an accredited
respiratory therapy program where the performance of duties that are regulated
by this chapter is an integral part of the student's program of study;

(4) A person employed by a durable medical equipment
provider who engages in the delivery, assembly, setup, testing, and
demonstration of oxygen and aerosol equipment upon the order of a physician;
provided that no person providing those services shall be authorized to assess
patients, develop care plans, instruct patients in taking treatment, or discuss
the hazards, administration, or side effects of medication with patients;

(5) A person rendering services in the case of an
emergency or in the domestic administration of family remedies; or

(6) A person employed by a federal, state, or county
government agency in a respiratory therapist position, but only in the course
of carrying out the duties and responsibilities of government employment. [L
2010, c 178, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next